ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?> 
    <!-- 	Dictionary: 	Sections: 4 	Entries: 10932 	Sdefs: 82 	Paradigms: 451 	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools fix -standard apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix cstmp  --> 
<dictionary>   
  <alphabet>AÁBCČDĎEÉĚFGHIÍJKLMNŇOÓPQRŘSŠTŤUÚŮVWXYÝZŽaábcčdďeéěfghiíjklmnňoópqrřsštťuúůvwxyýzžĄĆĘŃŚŻŹŁąćęńśżźłĕ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    <sdef n="sent" />
    <sdef n="cm" />
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="rel" />
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="vbhaver" />
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="qnt" />
    <sdef n="abbr" />
    <sdef n="ger" />
    <sdef n="tgv" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="sint" />
    <sdef n="comp" />
    <sdef n="sup" />
    <sdef n="ma" 	c="mužský životný"/>
    <sdef n="mi" 	c="mužský neživotný"/>
    <sdef n="f" 	c="ženský"/>
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="střední"/>
    <sdef n="mf" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="m" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="nominativ"/>
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="genitiv"/>
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="dativ"/>
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="akuzativ"/>
    <sdef n="ins" 	c="instrumentál"/>
    <sdef n="loc" 	c="lokál"/>
    <sdef n="voc" 	c="vokativ"/>
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="singulár"/>
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="plurál"/>
    <sdef n="du" 	c="duál"/>
    <sdef n="sp" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="acr" />
    <sdef n="ppr" />
    <sdef n="emph" />
    <sdef n="dem" />
    <sdef n="pos" />
    <sdef n="itg" />
    <sdef n="ind" />
    <sdef n="ref" />
    <sdef n="an" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="top" />
    <sdef n="cog" />
    <sdef n="hyd" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="časování"/>
    <sdef n="vaux" />
    <sdef n="impf" 	c="nedokonavé"/>
    <sdef n="perf" 	c="dokonavé"/>
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="první osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="druhá osoba"/>
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="třetí osoba"/>
    <sdef n="pres" 	c="přítomný čas"/>
    <sdef n="past" 	c="minulý čas"/>
    <sdef n="pp" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="pprs" />
    <sdef n="pass" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="fut" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="inf" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="rozkazovací způsob"/>
    <sdef n="indecl" 	c="indeclinable"/>
    <sdef n="enc" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="uns" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="být"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="spojka"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="spojka"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="spojka"/>
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="dim" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="ij" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="cmp" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="po" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="percent" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="ord" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="impers" 	c=""/>    
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>     
    <!-- Punctuation -->     
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
       
    <!-- Abbreviations -->     
    <pardef n="např__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="ahoj__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
       
    <!-- Numerals -->     
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><i>1</i><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[2-4]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[5-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="qnt"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <!-- Adjective bases -->     
    <pardef n="BASE__další">
      <e><p><l>ího</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ímu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ího</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ími</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ího</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ímu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ími</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ími</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ího</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ímu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ími</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="Kč"><i>Kč</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="a.s."><i>a.s.</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="aj"><i>aj</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="atp"><p><l>ap</l><r>atp</r></p><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="api"><i>api</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="atp"><p><l>apod</l><r>atp</r></p><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ascii"><i>ascii</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="bmp"><i>bmp</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="cca"><i>cca</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="dag"><i>dag</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="fr"><i>fr</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="gr"><i>gr</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="h"><i>h</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ha"><i>ha</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="hl"><i>hl</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="h"><p><l>hod</l><r>h</r></p><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="ing"><i>ing</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="ing"><p><l>inž</l><r>ing</r></p><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="jpg"><i>jpg</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="kb"><i>kb</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="max"><i>max</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mg"><i>mg</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mgr"><i>mgr</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="mil"><i>mil</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="min"><i>min</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="mld"><i>mld</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="n.l."><i>n.l.</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="n.m."><i>n.m.</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="např"><i>např</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="pí"><i>pí</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="př.n.l."><i>př.n.l.</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="r."><i>r.</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="rep"><i>rep</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="str"><i>str</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="t.r."><i>t.r.</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tab"><i>tab</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="tél"><p><l>tel</l><r>tél</r></p><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="tis"><i>tis</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="utc"><i>utc</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="utf"><i>utf</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="www"><i>www</i><par n="např__abbr"/></e>
<e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="aha"><i>aha</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ahoj"><i>ahoj</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrou chuť"><i>dobrou<b/>chuť</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrou noc"><i>dobrou<b/>noc</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobré odpoledne"><i>dobré<b/>odpoledne</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobré ráno"><i>dobré<b/>ráno</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrý den"><i>dobrý<b/>den</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrý večer"><i>dobrý<b/>večer</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="děkuji mockrát"><i>děkuji<b/>mockrát</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="haló"><i>haló</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hezký den"><i>hezký<b/>den</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="je mi líto"><i>je<b/>mi<b/>líto</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="mňam"><i>mňam</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="na shledanou"><i>na<b/>shledanou</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="na zdrawí"><i>na<b/>zdrawí</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="není zač"><i>není<b/>zač</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="omlouvám se"><i>omlouvám<b/>se</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="promiň"><i>promiň</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="prosím"><i>prosím</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="s radostí"><i>s<b/>radostí</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="zítra na shledanou"><i>zítra<b/>na<b/>shledanou</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="čau"><i>čau</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e lm="dík"><i>dík</i><par n="ahoj__ij"/></e>
